District of Columbia statutes.
47-340.11

Maintenance of documents.

Copies of the specimen bonds and of the final financing documents and closing documents shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of the District.

History

Sept. 20, 1995, D.C. Law 11-46, § 12, 42 DCR 3603
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-340.11.